District of Columbia statutes.
38-1305

Education Licensure Commission — Transfer of positions; personnel; establishment of panels.

(a)

There shall be transferred to the Commission such positions and their funding that formerly were assigned to the Board of Higher Education for the approval and licensure of post-secondary institutions.

(b)

Personnel shall be appointed and compensation fixed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 1.

(c)

The Commission may set up panels of persons qualified to inspect, evaluate and make recommendations concerning the approval for licensure of the several kinds of institutions covered by this chapter.

History

Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 5, 23 DCR 8734
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(y), 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-217, § 2(e), 36 DCR 523

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1605.
1973 Ed., § 31-2005.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law (Act 21-172), Jan. _, 2016, 62 DCR 13983).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-158, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13715).

Editor's Notes

2-139: See § 1-637.1.